Hawaii statutes.
§174C-12 Judicial review of rules and
orders of the commission concerning the water code. [Repeal and
reenactment on July 1, 2019. L 2016, c 48, §14.] Except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, judicial review of rules and orders of the
commission under this chapter shall be governed by chapter 91. Trial de novo
is not allowed on review of commission actions under this chapter. [L 1987, c
45, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 48, §6]

Note

Judiciary report to 2019 legislature on change in judicial
proceedings made by L 2016, c 48. L 2016, c 48, §12.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next